Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2910
Resale or redisclosure of information.

(1) An authorized recipient of personal information disclosed under section 60-2906 or 60-2907, except a recipient under subdivision (11) of section 60-2907, may resell or redisclose the information only for the uses permitted under section 60-2907, but not including the use for bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations as set forth in subdivision (11) of such section.

(2) An authorized recipient of personal information for bulk distribution for surveys, marketing, or solicitations under subdivision (11) of section 60-2907 may resell or redisclose personal information only in accordance with the terms of such subdivision concerning the right of individuals who have so consented to such disclosure.

(3) An authorized recipient who resells or rediscloses personal information shall (a) make and keep for a period of not less than five years records identifying each person who received personal information from the authorized recipient and the permitted purpose for which it was obtained and (b) make such records available for inspection and copying by a representative of the department upon request.

(4) The department may implement any safeguard which the department considers reasonable or necessary, including a bond requirement, in a memorandum of understanding executed under this section to ensure that the information provided or sold is used only for a permissible purpose and that the rights of individuals and the interest of the state are protected.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 1317, § 15.